District of Columbia statutes.
1-608.66

Privilege.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit, waive, or abrogate the scope or nature of the attorney-client privilege, whether statutory or common law, with respect to communications between attorneys employed by the Office of the Attorney General and subordinate agency personnel, or legal advice given by Office of the Attorney General attorneys to subordinate agency personnel before the date of the appointment of these attorneys to positions in the subordinate agencies. This privilege shall continue to apply fully to all communications made and legal advice provided between subordinate agency personnel and attorneys employed by the subordinate agencies after attorneys are transferred to the subordinate agency.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 866
as added Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-60, § 101(m), 60 DCR 15487

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-60 added this section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see note to § 1-608.51.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of D.C. Law 20-60, § 401(a), see §§ 1013, 1014(b), and 1014(c) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, Jan. 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-155, § 1014(c), see § 7002 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 20-60 provided that § 101 of the act shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-60: Section 1013 of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2018; Section 1014(b) of D.C. Law 20-155 amended D.C. Law 20-60 to provide that D.C. Law 20-60, §  101, shall apply as of October 1, 2014.

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-155: Section 1014(c) of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that § 1014 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7002 of D.C. Law 21-36 repealed D.C. Law 20-155, §  1014(c).